ko: 탈크 함량: 탈크 감소; 탈크 베이스; 탈크 프리; 기타
pt-BR: Conteúdo de talco: Talco reduzido; À base de talco; Sem talco; Outro
sl-SI: Vsebnost talka: Zmanjšana vsebnost smukca; Na osnovi smukca; Brez smukca; Drugo
nl: Talkgehalte: Verminderd talk; Op basis van talk; Talkvrij; Andere
vi: Hàm lượng talc: Giảm bột talc; Có chứa bột talc; Không chứa bột talc; Khác
it: Contenuto di talco: Talco ridotto; A base di talco; Senza talco; Altro
nb: Talkinnhold: Redusert talkum; Talkumbasert; Talkumfri; Annet
de: Talkgehalt: Reduzierter Talkgehalt; Auf Talkbasis; Talkfrei; Sonstiges
es: Contenido de talco: Talco reducido; A base de talco; Sin talco; Otros
sk-SK: Obsah mastenca: Znížený obsah mastenca; Na báze mastenca; Bez mastenca; Iné
ru: Содержание талька: Пониженное содержание талька; На основе талька; Без талька; Другой
hu: Talkumtartalom: Csökkentett talkumtartalmú; Talkum alapú; Talkummentes; Egyéb
en: Talc content: Reduced talc; Talc-based; Talc-free; Other
da: Talkumindhold: Reduceret talk; Talkbaseret; Talkfri; Andet
fi: Talkkipitoisuus: Vähennetty talkki; Talkkipohjainen; Talkiton; Muu
ja: タルク含有量: タルク減量; タルクベース; タルクフリー; その他
ro-RO: Conținutul de talc: Talc redus; Pe bază de talc; Fără talc; Altele
sv: Talkinnehåll: Reducerad talk; Talkbaserad; Talkfri; Övrigt
zh-TW: 滑石粉含量: 減少滑石粉; 滑石粉基底; 無滑石粉; 其他
tr: Talk içeriği: Azaltılmış talk; Talk bazlı; Talksız; Diğer
el: Περιεκτικότητα σε τάλκη: Μειωμένη τάλκη; Με βάση την τάλκη; Χωρίς τάλκη; Άλλο
cs: Obsah mastku: Snížený obsah mastku; Na bázi mastku; Bez mastku; Jiné
hr-HR: Sadržaj talka: Smanjen sadržaj talka; Na bazi talka; Bez talka; Ostalo
bg-BG: Съдържание на талк: Намален талк; На база талк; Без талк; Други
pl: Zawartość talku: Zmniejszona zawartość talku; Na bazie talku; Bez talku; Inne
pt-PT: Conteúdo de talco: Talco reduzido; À base de talco; Sem talco; Outro
th: ปริมาณแป้งทัลก์: แป้งทัลก์ลดลง; ฐานแป้งทัลก์; ไม่มีแป้งทัลก์; อื่นๆ
fr: Teneur en talc: Talc réduit; À base de talc; Sans talc; Autre
zh-CN: 滑石粉含量: 减少滑石粉; 滑石粉基质; 不含滑石粉; 其他
lt-LT: Talko kiekis: Sumažintas talko kiekis; Talko pagrindu; Be talko; Kita